Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 11. Construction, Rehabilitation, and Improvement of Schools and Education-Related Facilities.

Cross references. —

For provision requiring the Department of Education and Early Development to present to the legislature no later than June 15, 2015 a report on the benefits and disadvantages of using prototypical designs for school construction in both the Railbelt and rural areas of the state, see sec. 53, ch. 15, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee to procure a study to be completed no later than June 15, 2015 to evaluate current public school funding provisions under AS 14.11 — AS 14.17, see sec. 54, ch. 15, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For school facility planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Appropriations to retire municipal general obligation school bond indebtedness under this chapter are “required” and qualify as an exception to the spending limit of § 16, art. IX, of the state constitution. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.